Utah statutes.
7-7-38.   Reports and examinations required -- Access to records.
Every association shall file such reports and be subject to such examinations
as may be required by the commissioner under the provisions of Title 7,
Chapter 1, Part 3, Powers and Duties of Commissioner of Financial
Institutions.  In lieu of any examination required under that article, the
commissioner may accept any examination made by the Office of Thrift
Supervision, the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation, or their successor
federal agencies, or an association's supervisory authority of another state.
The commissioner, the supervisor, or their examiners or auditors shall have
free access to all books and papers of an association, savings and loan
holding company or any subsidiary thereof, the principal office of which is
located in this state.
